test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N13
+N13:nqnw	Cases ;
+N13:nwge	Cases ;
+N13:ndif	Cases ;
+N13:nezz	Cases ;
+N13:nynå	Cases ;
+N13:npäm	Cases ;
+N13:nbnå	Cases ;
+N13:nääy	Cases ;
+N13:nfnu	Cases ;
+N13:nsrx	Cases ;
+N13:npiv	Cases ;
+N13:nqfh	Cases ;
+N13:npqn	Cases ;
+N13:nvwf	Cases ;
+N13:ncvf	Cases ;
+N13:nhgm	Cases ;
+N13:nläi	Cases ;
+N13:nedd	Cases ;
+N13:nuuz	Cases ;
+N13:ncew	Cases ;
+N13:nhwk	Cases ;
+N13:nögz	Cases ;
+N13:nzuå	Cases ;
+N13:nfcx	Cases ;
+N13:nåau	Cases ;
+N13:nsöd	Cases ;
+N13:nhig	Cases ;
+N13:nexw	Cases ;
+N13:nldz	Cases ;
+N13:ndåa	Cases ;
+N13:nnpm	Cases ;
+N13:näbj	Cases ;
+N13:nbyq	Cases ;
+N13:nlqä	Cases ;
+N13:nxzt	Cases ;
+N13:nkbf	Cases ;
+N13:nöås	Cases ;
+N13:narg	Cases ;
+N13:nneä	Cases ;
+N13:nznh	Cases ;
+N13:nthk	Cases ;
+N13:ncwe	Cases ;
+N13:ndqv	Cases ;
+N13:nqgy	Cases ;
+N13:nfmq	Cases ;
+N13:npfe	Cases ;
+N13:ngon	Cases ;
+N13:naäi	Cases ;
+N13:nrxp	Cases ;
+N13:nkån	Cases ;
+N13:nnra	Cases ;
+N13:nöoh	Cases ;
+N13:ncfå	Cases ;
+N13:nhjj	Cases ;
+N13:nihl	Cases ;
+N13:nvxb	Cases ;
+N13:nkcj	Cases ;
+N13:nsqö	Cases ;
+N13:nåyå	Cases ;
+N13:nfcc	Cases ;
+N13:niwä	Cases ;
+N13:nwpu	Cases ;
+N13:noiä	Cases ;
+N13:nwdv	Cases ;
+N13:nefq	Cases ;
+N13:ncrw	Cases ;
+N13:neta	Cases ;
+N13:npqx	Cases ;
+N13:nåiz	Cases ;
+N13:nueb	Cases ;
+N13:nydd	Cases ;
+N13:niqw	Cases ;
+N13:nhyö	Cases ;
+N13:nrwv	Cases ;
+N13:naze	Cases ;
+N13:nrxx	Cases ;
+N13:ngof	Cases ;
+N13:nwuq	Cases ;
+N13:nkvc	Cases ;
+N13:nåwf	Cases ;
+N13:nptn	Cases ;
+N13:nräe	Cases ;
+N13:nmön	Cases ;
+N13:nkxz	Cases ;
+N13:nywc	Cases ;
+N13:nzyh	Cases ;
+N13:ndnå	Cases ;
+N13:npåg	Cases ;
+N13:nsxe	Cases ;
+N13:näwn	Cases ;
+N13:nzlo	Cases ;
+N13:nväv	Cases ;
+N13:nmdl	Cases ;
+N13:nzwj	Cases ;
+N13:nwåf	Cases ;
+N13:nshx	Cases ;
+N13:nbeö	Cases ;
+N13:ndvr	Cases ;
+N13:nåkk	Cases ;


LEXICON N14
+N14:olky	Cases ;
+N14:ohbd	Cases ;
+N14:oouu	Cases ;
+N14:oxil	Cases ;
+N14:otkz	Cases ;
+N14:ovdg	Cases ;
+N14:oäeq	Cases ;
+N14:oxer	Cases ;
+N14:oöow	Cases ;
+N14:oövl	Cases ;
+N14:obze	Cases ;
+N14:oswn	Cases ;
+N14:oaäl	Cases ;
+N14:oxns	Cases ;
+N14:olön	Cases ;
+N14:otar	Cases ;
+N14:ojfk	Cases ;
+N14:odfu	Cases ;
+N14:okgw	Cases ;
+N14:onou	Cases ;
+N14:ozkn	Cases ;
+N14:olhp	Cases ;
+N14:odps	Cases ;
+N14:oisa	Cases ;
+N14:ofbk	Cases ;
+N14:oboh	Cases ;
+N14:ouzx	Cases ;
+N14:opän	Cases ;
+N14:odbw	Cases ;
+N14:ocfo	Cases ;
+N14:owli	Cases ;
+N14:oäzy	Cases ;
+N14:oabg	Cases ;
+N14:okms	Cases ;
+N14:otgp	Cases ;
+N14:ooiw	Cases ;
+N14:ohui	Cases ;
+N14:ouäs	Cases ;
+N14:okjm	Cases ;
+N14:ovdt	Cases ;
+N14:oohy	Cases ;
+N14:oooo	Cases ;
+N14:oånw	Cases ;
+N14:oozc	Cases ;
+N14:oåwr	Cases ;
+N14:ozji	Cases ;
+N14:ozål	Cases ;
+N14:ogrp	Cases ;
+N14:otbo	Cases ;
+N14:olej	Cases ;
+N14:okän	Cases ;
+N14:ofkm	Cases ;
+N14:ogqa	Cases ;
+N14:ozäw	Cases ;
+N14:omqc	Cases ;
+N14:ojmo	Cases ;
+N14:oqwm	Cases ;
+N14:omxä	Cases ;
+N14:osöä	Cases ;
+N14:oddt	Cases ;
+N14:oggo	Cases ;
+N14:oziu	Cases ;
+N14:otmw	Cases ;
+N14:owij	Cases ;
+N14:omgr	Cases ;
+N14:oxgm	Cases ;
+N14:ouck	Cases ;
+N14:owwz	Cases ;
+N14:opåe	Cases ;
+N14:olwx	Cases ;
+N14:oärg	Cases ;
+N14:oqaz	Cases ;
+N14:onmå	Cases ;
+N14:occk	Cases ;
+N14:oato	Cases ;
+N14:osbw	Cases ;
+N14:oäuf	Cases ;
+N14:oaeö	Cases ;
+N14:ordf	Cases ;
+N14:ojcj	Cases ;
+N14:opån	Cases ;
+N14:oaäc	Cases ;
+N14:oxyä	Cases ;
+N14:ohcm	Cases ;
+N14:oief	Cases ;
+N14:ovwa	Cases ;
+N14:omcz	Cases ;
+N14:otåu	Cases ;
+N14:olhf	Cases ;
+N14:oöci	Cases ;
+N14:ofed	Cases ;
+N14:octr	Cases ;
+N14:ovax	Cases ;
+N14:ovpd	Cases ;
+N14:otäi	Cases ;
+N14:ozhö	Cases ;
+N14:osiy	Cases ;
+N14:oolv	Cases ;
+N14:ogög	Cases ;


LEXICON N15
+N15:pxmf	Cases ;
+N15:prpb	Cases ;
+N15:pwcs	Cases ;
+N15:pcsa	Cases ;
+N15:pntn	Cases ;
+N15:pbqö	Cases ;
+N15:psmr	Cases ;
+N15:paöö	Cases ;
+N15:pkub	Cases ;
+N15:pgfj	Cases ;
+N15:pleä	Cases ;
+N15:pfyö	Cases ;
+N15:piön	Cases ;
+N15:pvnf	Cases ;
+N15:prpe	Cases ;
+N15:pohh	Cases ;
+N15:pqrö	Cases ;
+N15:pmbt	Cases ;
+N15:phqå	Cases ;
+N15:pcfo	Cases ;
+N15:pvyj	Cases ;
+N15:pwjg	Cases ;
+N15:ptaa	Cases ;
+N15:pvtf	Cases ;
+N15:ppls	Cases ;
+N15:ppmy	Cases ;
+N15:pmsm	Cases ;
+N15:pkhy	Cases ;
+N15:pwcg	Cases ;
+N15:pfui	Cases ;
+N15:psal	Cases ;
+N15:pgrp	Cases ;
+N15:ptci	Cases ;
+N15:puur	Cases ;
+N15:pszr	Cases ;
+N15:puil	Cases ;
+N15:pyev	Cases ;
+N15:pfgä	Cases ;
+N15:påcr	Cases ;
+N15:pelä	Cases ;
+N15:pqxk	Cases ;
+N15:proy	Cases ;
+N15:plzi	Cases ;
+N15:pöat	Cases ;
+N15:pooö	Cases ;
+N15:ppjp	Cases ;
+N15:psnk	Cases ;
+N15:penv	Cases ;
+N15:pfcf	Cases ;
+N15:paäe	Cases ;
+N15:pxwa	Cases ;
+N15:puöi	Cases ;
+N15:pcpn	Cases ;
+N15:phem	Cases ;
+N15:phäi	Cases ;
+N15:pghc	Cases ;
+N15:pwtw	Cases ;
+N15:phmd	Cases ;
+N15:pvan	Cases ;
+N15:psvn	Cases ;
+N15:pemö	Cases ;
+N15:pcvp	Cases ;
+N15:pytb	Cases ;
+N15:plgf	Cases ;
+N15:pöen	Cases ;
+N15:pnli	Cases ;
+N15:pözo	Cases ;
+N15:pfmi	Cases ;
+N15:ptsa	Cases ;
+N15:pozv	Cases ;
+N15:psxi	Cases ;
+N15:pöws	Cases ;
+N15:påwg	Cases ;
+N15:pbig	Cases ;
+N15:pixt	Cases ;
+N15:peej	Cases ;
+N15:pfys	Cases ;
+N15:pmvu	Cases ;
+N15:pxyä	Cases ;
+N15:puek	Cases ;
+N15:pqdm	Cases ;
+N15:pilb	Cases ;
+N15:päbf	Cases ;
+N15:pjhä	Cases ;
+N15:ppri	Cases ;
+N15:pkza	Cases ;
+N15:pyfs	Cases ;
+N15:piym	Cases ;
+N15:päui	Cases ;
+N15:puzs	Cases ;
+N15:pqsa	Cases ;
+N15:pöyf	Cases ;
+N15:phsc	Cases ;
+N15:peqd	Cases ;
+N15:pndw	Cases ;
+N15:piåt	Cases ;
+N15:prae	Cases ;
+N15:pcck	Cases ;
+N15:pjöx	Cases ;


LEXICON N16
+N16:qärk	Cases ;
+N16:qenw	Cases ;
+N16:qzjä	Cases ;
+N16:qome	Cases ;
+N16:qqjs	Cases ;
+N16:qmge	Cases ;
+N16:qapa	Cases ;
+N16:qmsy	Cases ;
+N16:qågz	Cases ;
+N16:qxql	Cases ;
+N16:qewe	Cases ;
+N16:qhmö	Cases ;
+N16:qöwh	Cases ;
+N16:qgkm	Cases ;
+N16:qmag	Cases ;
+N16:qpqo	Cases ;
+N16:qceh	Cases ;
+N16:qkov	Cases ;
+N16:qfhä	Cases ;
+N16:qvlg	Cases ;
+N16:qnzb	Cases ;
+N16:qblp	Cases ;
+N16:qvkv	Cases ;
+N16:qqäi	Cases ;
+N16:qzph	Cases ;
+N16:qjrb	Cases ;
+N16:qpgy	Cases ;
+N16:quiq	Cases ;
+N16:qögv	Cases ;
+N16:qgtj	Cases ;
+N16:qzzu	Cases ;
+N16:qåfv	Cases ;
+N16:qzjå	Cases ;
+N16:qaab	Cases ;
+N16:qmlr	Cases ;
+N16:qzud	Cases ;
+N16:qäry	Cases ;
+N16:qfvp	Cases ;
+N16:qoef	Cases ;
+N16:qbsr	Cases ;
+N16:qqpw	Cases ;
+N16:qåcu	Cases ;
+N16:qwäx	Cases ;
+N16:qzån	Cases ;
+N16:qphö	Cases ;
+N16:qqeq	Cases ;
+N16:qdlb	Cases ;
+N16:qdes	Cases ;
+N16:qnko	Cases ;
+N16:qxqå	Cases ;
+N16:qqpq	Cases ;
+N16:qjod	Cases ;
+N16:qgvq	Cases ;
+N16:qrmg	Cases ;
+N16:qäöl	Cases ;
+N16:qbgz	Cases ;
+N16:qoäg	Cases ;
+N16:qaät	Cases ;
+N16:qgdn	Cases ;
+N16:quöj	Cases ;
+N16:qjjz	Cases ;
+N16:qual	Cases ;
+N16:qqöz	Cases ;
+N16:qsoy	Cases ;
+N16:qdgs	Cases ;
+N16:qöbu	Cases ;
+N16:qöpw	Cases ;
+N16:qxmw	Cases ;
+N16:qhaw	Cases ;
+N16:qbmn	Cases ;
+N16:quiy	Cases ;
+N16:qtvv	Cases ;
+N16:qbhj	Cases ;
+N16:qqqi	Cases ;
+N16:qxbå	Cases ;
+N16:qhbä	Cases ;
+N16:qvgr	Cases ;
+N16:qvoo	Cases ;
+N16:qgåä	Cases ;
+N16:qtvd	Cases ;
+N16:qliy	Cases ;
+N16:qfdi	Cases ;
+N16:qsäa	Cases ;
+N16:qmtn	Cases ;
+N16:qföv	Cases ;
+N16:qbcö	Cases ;
+N16:qläm	Cases ;
+N16:qslz	Cases ;
+N16:qqsm	Cases ;
+N16:qimh	Cases ;
+N16:qxao	Cases ;
+N16:qryj	Cases ;
+N16:qwmn	Cases ;
+N16:qyve	Cases ;
+N16:qnyy	Cases ;
+N16:qmej	Cases ;
+N16:qlss	Cases ;
+N16:qzuz	Cases ;
+N16:qcgs	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
m N13 ;
n N14 ;
o N15 ;
p N16 ;
